en: Khorasan wheat flakes, Kamut flakes
de: Kamutflocken
es: Copos de trigo de Jorasán, Copos de Kamut
fr: Flocons de blé khorasan, Flocons de blé de khorasan, Flocons de Kamut
hr: Khorasan pšenične pahuljice
nl: Kamutvlokken

en: Extruded wheat flakes
fr: Pétales de blé

en: Wild rice flakes
es: Copos de arroz salvaje
fr: Flocons de riz sauvage, flocons de zizanie
hr: Pahuljice divlje riže
lt: Laukinių ryžių dribsniai
nl: Wilde rijstvlokken

en: Puffed cereals, Popped cereals
de: gepufftes Getreide
es: Cereales inflados
fi: paisutettuja muroja
fr: Céréales soufflées
hr: Napuhane žitarice
it: Cereali soffiati
lt: Pūsti javai
nl: Gepofte ontbijtgranen

en: Puffed grains, Popped grains
de: Puffkörner, gepuffte körner
es: Granos inflados
fi: puffatut jyvät
fr: Grains soufflées
hr: Napuhana zrna
it: Chicchi soffiati
lt: Pūsti grūdai
nl: Gepofte granen

en: Mixed puffed cereals
es: Mezclas de cereales inflados
fr: Mélanges de céréales soufflés
hr: Miješane lisnate žitarice
lt: Įvairūs pūsti javai
nl: Gepofte granenmelanges

en: Popcorn, pop-corn, Popped popcorn
bg: Пуканки
ca: Crispetes
de: Popcorn, Puffmais
es: Palomitas de maíz, Maíz inflado
fi: popcorn
fr: Popcorn, Pop-corn, maïs éclaté, tactac
he: פופקורן
hr: Kokice
hu: Pattogatott kukorica
it: Popcorn
ja: ポップコーン
lt: Spraginti kukurūzai
nl: Popcorn
pt: Pipocas
ru: Попкорн
tr: Patlamış mısır

en: Plain popcorn, Unsalted pop-corn, Unsalted air-popped maize
fr: Popcorn nature, Pop-corn non salé, Maïs éclaté à l'air non salé
hr: Obične kokice
lt: Spraginti kukurūzai be druskos

en: Salted popcorn, Salted pop-corn, Salted oil popped maize
bg: Солени пуканки
de: Gesalzenes Popcorn
es: Palomitas de maíz saladas
fi: suolattu popcorn
fr: Popcorn salé, Pop-corn salé, Maïs éclaté à l'huile salé
hr: Slane kokice
hu: sós popkorn
it: Popcorn salati
lt: Spraginti kukurūzai su druska
nl: Gezouten popcorn
pl: Solony popcorn

en: Sugared popcorn
bg: Сладки пуканки
de: Süßes Popcorn
es: Palomitas azucaradas
fr: Popcorn sucré
hr: Zašećerene kokice
it: Popcorn dolci
lt: Spraginti kukurūzai be cukrum
nl: Zoete popcorn
pt: Pipocas com açucar

en: Popcorn with caramel, Popped maize with caramel, Salted caramel popcorn
bg: Пуканки с карамел
fr: Popcorn au caramel, Maïs éclaté au caramel
hr: Kokice s karamelom
lt: Spraginti kukurūzai su karamele

en: Puffed barley
es: Cebada inflada, Cebada hinchada
fr: Orge soufflé
hr: Napuhan ječam
lt: Pūsti miežiai
nl: Gepofte gerst

en: Puffed buckwheat
es: Trigo sarraceno inflado, Trigo sarraceno hinchado
fr: Sarrasin soufflé
hr: Napuhana heljda
lt: Pūsti grikiai
nl: Gepofte boekweit

en: Puffed millet
es: Mijo inflado, Mijo hinchado
fr: Millet soufflé
hr: Napuhnuto proso
it: Miglio soffiato
lt: Pūstos soros
nl: Gepofte gierst

en: Puffed oat
es: Avena inflada, Avena hinchada
fr: Avoine soufflé
hr: Pufnasta zob
lt: Pūstos avižos
nl: Gepofte haver

en: Puffed quinoa
es: Quinoa inflada, Quinoa hinchada
fr: Quinoa soufflé
hr: Lisnatu kvinoju
it: Quinoa soffiata
lt: Pūstos quinoa
nl: Gepofte quinoa

en: Puffed amaranth
fr: Amaranthe soufflée
hr: Napuhani amarant
it: Amaranto soffiato
lt: Pūsti amarantai

en: Puffed rice
ar: أرز منتفخ
as: মুড়ি
bn: মুড়ি
de: Puffreis
es: Arroz inflado
eu: Arroz puztu
fa: برنجک
fi: puffattu riisi
fr: Riz soufflé
gl: Arroz inflado
he: פצפוצי אורז
hr: ekspandirana riža
it: Riso soffiato
jv: Sega pop
kn: ಮಂಡಕ್ಕಿ
ko: 튀밥
lt: Pūsti ryžiai
ml: മലർ
nl: Gepofte rijst
nn: Puffa ris
or: ମୁଢ଼ି
ro: orez expandat
ru: Воздушный рис
sa: भ्रष्टतण्डुलः
sv: Puffat ris
ta: பொரி
te: బొరుగులు
tr: Şişmiş pirinç
vi: Twibap
zh: 米香

en: Plain puffed rice
fr: Riz soufflé nature

en: Sweetened puffed rice
fr: Riz soufflé sucré